District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Convention Center Dedicated Employee Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title II of the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective
September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law 10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1201.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new section 203c to read as follows:
“Sec. 203c. Use of temporary employees.
“(a) The Authority shall prohibit any food and beverage service operator from:
“(1) Using temporary employees for the provision of food and beverage services
at the new convention center unless:
“(A) A bona fide unexpected emergency occurs that precludes adequate
staffing with permanent employees for a particular event; or
“(B) Necessary to fulfill a contract for the provision of temporary
employees existing upon the effective date of the Convention Center Dedicated Employee
Amendment Act of 2026 (Introduced version of B26-____) with terms that preclude


cancellation, but only for the remaining duration of such contract, without extensions or
amendments, or 30 days, whichever is less;
“(2) Maintaining a cap or limit on the number of overtime hours that a permanent
employee providing food and beverage service at the new convention center may work; and
“(3) Maintaining a policy or rule prohibiting the hiring of employees who provide
food and beverage service at other venues in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area that the
food and beverage service operator manages or operates, or otherwise discriminating against
such employees in hiring or employment practices at the new convention center.
“(b) The Authority shall include the prohibitions described in subsection (a) of this
section in an express term of any new, renewed, amended, or extended agreement for food and
beverage service operations at the new convention center.
“(c) For the purposes of this section, a “temporary employee” includes a casual
employee, seasonal employee, relief employee, limited-term employee, per diem employee, or
any other employee who has not been hired for a permanent position.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December


24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.